src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v1_odd  !!≈ * **@CODE@** käsittää>käsittänny osv 
+V+Inf:%>^A KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^WG%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^WG%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^V K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Err/Orth:^WG%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^WG%>mm^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^WG%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vv^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>^V K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^AE^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^AE^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^WG%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:^WG%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i8 K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth:^WG%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^WG%>i3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^WG%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^A K ; !wrong form
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3vv^A K ; !unusual form...
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^AE^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^AE^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isin K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>^E2Is K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>i4si K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isi K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isimm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4siv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>^E2Isiv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>siv^At K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:^AE^WG%>tt^A%>i4s K ; 
+V+Pass+Cond+Err/Orth:^AE^WG%>tt^A%>s K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4si K ;
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>^E2Iisi K ;

+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! also hm but first just for two-syll (position 4); antahmaan
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ; !isthuun, seishoon, laulhaan
+V+InfMa+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn K ; !lauhlaan
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ade+Err/Orth:%>m^All^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:%>v^A x3 ; 
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:%>vv^A x3 ; !HERE?
+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>v^A x3 ; !HERE?
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:^AE^WG%>tt^Avv^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:^AE^WG%>tt^Av^A x3 ; 

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>n^HMET2%>heet K;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^AE^WG%>tt^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Der/A+A:^AE^WG%>tt^U x3 ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^AE^WG%>t^Ut K ;

+V+AgPrc:%>m^A K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Err/Orth: # ; !armahta? CHECK EK
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:^WG # ; !plus älä (älä anna)
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>k^O # ; !plus älä (älkää antako)

! ! Derivation
+V+Der/minen:mi nen ;


LEXICON v1_odd_var  !!≈ * **@CODE@** tapahtua >tapahtun & tapahun !TBC - where does it occur?
v1_odd ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^AE%>th^A^An K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;

LEXICON v1_taitaa !!≈ * **@CODE@** taitaa-lexicon because of t:s although no a:0 in suffix
+V+Inf:ta%>^A KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ta^WG%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ta^WG%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ta%>^V K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ta^WG%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Err/Orth:ta^WG%>mm^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ta^WG%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ta%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ta%>^V K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ta^AE^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ta%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:ta^WG K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:ta^AE^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:ta^WG%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^s%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:s%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:s%>i3 K ; ! genererar tunsi men också antoi
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:s%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:s%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:s%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:s%>i3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:s%>i3v^At K ; !
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ta^AE^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:ta^AE^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:ta%>i4sin K ; !taitaisin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1+Err/Orth:ta%>si4n K ; !taitasin
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:ta%>i4sit K ; !taitaisit
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth:ta%>si4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:ta%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:ta%>s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3+Err/Orth:ta%>i4si K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:ta%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:ta%>i4sim^A K ; !tidigare Err/Orth
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:ta%>si4mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:ta%>si4m^A K ; !tidigare Err/Orth
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:ta%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2+Err/Orth:ta%>si4tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:ta%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:ta%>si4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:ta%>i4siv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:ta%>i4sivv^A K ; !HERE?
+V+Pass+Cond:ta^AE^WG%>tt^A%>s K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:ta%>^E2Iisi K ;

+V+Inf+Tra:ta%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:ta%>^E2Iess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfE+Ine:ta%>^E2Iess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:ta%>^E2Ien K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:ta%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:ta%>mh^A^An K ; ! 
!+V+InfMa+Ill:ta^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ta^HMET2%>h^V^Vn K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ine:ta%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:ta%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:ta%>m^All^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:ta%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:ta%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:ta^AE^WG%>tt^Av^A x3 ; 
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:ta^AE^WG%>tt^Avv^A x3 ; !HERE?

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:ta%>^N^U K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ta%>^N^Ut K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:ta%>^Nhee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:ta%>n^HMET2%>heet K;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:ta^AE^WG%>tt^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:ta^AE^WG%>t^Ut K ; 

+V+AgPrc:ta%>m^A K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:ta^WG # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:ta%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:ta%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:ta%>kh^O^Ot # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:a # ; !plus älä (älä anna)
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:ta%>k^O # ; !plus älä (älkää antako)
!! Derivation
+V+Der/minen:tami nen ;
