src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
tohahtaa:tohahta v1_odd ;
kiljahtaa:kiljahta v1_odd ;
luikahtaa:luikahta v1_odd ;
maiskahtaa:maiskahta v1_odd ;
purskahtaa:purskahta v1_odd ;
liukahtaa:liukahta v1_odd ;
ilahtaa:ilahta v1_odd ;
kolahtaa:kolahta v1_odd ;
leimahtaa:leimahta v1_odd ;
uinahtaa:uinahta v1_odd ;
nopahtaa:nopahta v1_odd ;
pisahtaa:pisahta v1_odd ;
liepsahtaa:liepsahta v1_odd ;
klopsahtaa:klopsahta v1_odd ;
litsahtaa:litsahta v1_odd ;
levahtaa:levahta v1_odd ;
puhaltaa:puhalta v1_odd ;
kavaltaa:kavalta v1_odd ;
tuhveltaa:tuhvelta v1_odd ;
mistantaa:mistanta v1_odd ;
laajentaa:laajenta v1_odd ;
alentaa:alenta v1_odd ;
varmentaa:varmenta v1_odd ;
oksentaa:oksenta v1_odd ;
huonontaa:huononta v1_odd ;
pisartaa:pisarta v1_odd ;
nakertaa:nakerta v1_odd ;
mannertaa:mannerta v1_odd ;
kavertaa:kaverta v1_odd ;
pahkurtaa:pahkurta v1_odd ;
rengastaa:rengasta v1_odd ;
nulkastaa:nulkasta v1_odd ;
mellastaa:mellasta v1_odd ;
kinastaa:kinasta v1_odd ;
vierastaa:vierasta v1_odd ;
karsastaa:karsasta v1_odd ;
aivastaa:aivasta v1_odd ;
puhistaa:puhista v1_odd ;
mukistaa:mukista v1_odd ;
puolistaa:puolista v1_odd ;
luonnistaa:luonnista v1_odd ;
karistaa:karista v1_odd ;
totistaa:totista v1_odd ;
ujostaa:ujosta v1_odd ;
jolostaa:jolosta v1_odd ;
upostaa:uposta v1_odd ;
tuohustaa:tuohusta v1_odd ;
tukustaa:tukusta v1_odd ;
tollustaa:tollusta v1_odd ;
tihmustaa:tihmusta v1_odd ;
kennustaa:kennusta v1_odd ;
varustaa:varusta v1_odd ;
hosustaa:hosusta v1_odd ;
etustaa:etusta v1_odd ;
kotustaa:kotusta v1_odd ;
tuovustaa:tuovusta v1_odd ;
kakattaa:kakatta v1_odd ;
lapattaa:lapatta v1_odd ;
vuotattaa:vuotatta v1_odd ;
kaivattaa:kaivatta v1_odd ;
vaihettaa:vaihetta v1_odd ;
tulettaa:tuletta v1_odd ;
lopettaa:lopetta v1_odd ;
kovettaa:kovetta v1_odd ;
matkittaa:matkitta v1_odd ;
laimittaa:laimitta v1_odd ;
kahoittaa:kahoitta v1_odd ;
krupittaa:krupitta v1_odd ;
tansittaa:tansitta v1_odd ;
tuutittaa:tuutitta v1_odd ;
langottaa:langotta v1_odd ;
nahottaa:nahotta v1_odd ;
lihottaa:lihotta v1_odd ;
liottaa:liotta v1_odd ;
lijottaa:lijotta v1_odd ;
kakottaa:kakotta v1_odd ;
mulkottaa:mulkotta v1_odd ;
kurkottaa:kurkotta v1_odd ;
kotkottaa:kotkotta v1_odd ;
telottaa:telotta v1_odd ;
jollottaa:jollotta v1_odd ;
liimottaa:liimotta v1_odd ;
jumottaa:jumotta v1_odd ;
linnottaa:linnotta v1_odd ;
tipottaa:tipotta v1_odd ;
varottaa:varotta v1_odd ;
kierrottaa:kierrotta v1_odd ;
lastottaa:lastotta v1_odd ;
haavottaa:haavotta v1_odd ;
kirvottaa:kirvotta v1_odd ;
karfhauttaa:karfhautta v1_odd ;
pleekhauttaa:pleekhautta v1_odd ;
kiiskhauttaa:kiiskhautta v1_odd ;
kolhauttaa:kolhautta v1_odd ;
klaphauttaa:klaphautta v1_odd ;
paisthauttaa:paisthautta v1_odd ;
friskauttaa:friskautta v1_odd ;
veippauttaa:veippautta v1_odd ;
korttauttaa:korttautta v1_odd ;
liehuttaa:liehutta v1_odd ;
liikuttua:liikuttu v1_odd ;
laskuttaa:laskutta v1_odd ;
lauskuttaa:lauskutta v1_odd ;
naukuttaa:naukutta v1_odd ;
heiluttaa:heilutta v1_odd ;
lingouttaa:lingoutta v1_odd ;
paruttaa:parutta v1_odd ;
klipsuttaa:klipsutta v1_odd ;
hatuttaa:hatutta v1_odd ;
leikkuuttaa:leikkuutta v1_odd ;
lukittea:lukitte v1_odd ;
kujehtia:kujehti v1_odd ;
kalvehtia:kalvehti v1_odd ;
paheksua:paheksu v1_odd ;
tapahtua:tapahtu v1_odd_var ;
kasahtua:kasahtu v1_odd_var ;
paljehtua:paljehtu v1_odd_var ;
karjehtua:karjehtu v1_odd_var ;
laskehtua:laskehtu v1_odd_var ;
tukehtua:tukehtu v1_odd_var ;
vaalehtua:vaalehtu v1_odd_var ;
olehtua:olehtu v1_odd_var ;
tulehtua:tulehtu v1_odd_var ;
tuulehtua:tuulehtu v1_odd_var ;
ummehtua:ummehtu v1_odd_var ;
lummehtua:lummehtu v1_odd_var ;
tummehtua:tummehtu v1_odd_var ;
homehtua:homehtu v1_odd_var ;
lumehtua:lumehtu v1_odd_var ;
unehtua:unehtu v1_odd_var ;
punehtua:punehtu v1_odd_var ;
juurehtua:juurehtu v1_odd_var ;
haihtua:haihtu v1_odd_var ;
laihtua:laihtu v1_odd_var ;
kihtua:kihtu v1_odd_var ;
johtua:johtu v1_odd_var ;
paleltua:paleltu v1_odd ;
kievaantua:kievaant4u v1_odd ;
vaalentua:vaalentu v1_odd ;
vauhkaintua:vauhkaintu v1_odd ;
kiskaintua:kiskaintu v1_odd ;
kinnaintua:kinnaintu v1_odd ;
irtaintua:irtaintu v1_odd ;
kuoleintua:kuoleintu v1_odd ;
kiihkointua:kiihkointu v1_odd ;
kulluintua:kulluintu v1_odd ;
kasuuntua:kasuuntu v1_odd ;
pikastua:pikastu v1_odd ;
opastua:opastu v1_odd ;
kuvastua:kuvastu v1_odd ;
pullistua:pullistu v1_odd ;
luonistua:luonistu v1_odd ;
huonostua:huonostu v1_odd ;
asettua:asettu v1_odd ;
kahottua:kahottu v1_odd ;
maksottua:maksottu v1_odd ;
liittoutua:liittoutu v1_odd ;
nyehtiä:nyehti v1_odd ;
läkähtyä:läkähty v1_odd ;
keskheintyä:keskheinty v1_odd ;
kevveintyä:kevveinty v1_odd ;
kenkäintyä:kenkäinty v1_odd ;
kiertäintyä:kiertäinty v1_odd ;
tärvääntyä:tärväänt4y v1_odd ;
jäykistyä:jäykisty v1_odd ;
kitistyä:kitisty v1_odd ;
kylmettyä:kylmetty v1_odd ;
lyngähtää:lyngähtä v1_odd ;
mäiskähtää:mäiskähtä v1_odd ;
ärähtää:ärähtä v1_odd ;
peheltää:peheltä v1_odd ;
tyhjentää:tyhjentä v1_odd ;
tyentää:tyentä v1_odd ;
lähestää:lähestä v1_odd ;
mällistää:mällistä v1_odd ;
käyristää:käyristä v1_odd ;
kähmystää:kähmystä v1_odd ;
höröstää:höröstä v1_odd ;
iikittää:iikittä v1_odd ;
lämmittää:lämmittä v1_odd ;
kiesittää:kiesittä v1_odd ;
hävittää:hävittä v1_odd ;
nylkyttää:nylkyttä v1_odd ;
lötkyttää:lötkyttä v1_odd ;
hämyttää:hämyttä v1_odd ;
tylsyttää:tylsyttä v1_odd ;
määtyttää:määtyttä v1_odd ;
kierhäyttää:kierhäyttä v1_odd ;
tyyräyttää:tyyräyttä v1_odd ;
iättää:iättä v1_odd ;
köhöttää:köhöttä v1_odd ;
hölpöttää:hölpöttä v1_odd ;
töröttää:töröttä v1_odd ;
jeesustaa:jeesusta v1_odd ;
klaakottaa:klaakotta v1_odd ;
taitaa:tai v1_taitaa ;
